Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-214
Chairman of township board; appointment; qualifications.

The county board shall also, at the meeting at which it shall fix and name the several townships, appoint for each township some suitable person, who is an elector within the township, as chairman of the township board. The person so appointed shall, on or before the first Tuesday in January next ensuing, take the oath of office and file a bond as provided by law. Such bond shall be approved by the board as provided by law. In case such person shall neglect or refuse to qualify, the county board shall at its regular January meeting appoint another who shall qualify as above stated. The person so appointed shall hold said office until his successor shall be duly elected and qualified as provided by law.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 12, p. 135;

R.S.1913, § 998;

C.S.1922, § 900;

C.S.1929, § 26-214;

R.S.1943, § 23-214;

Laws 1957, c. 62, § 1, p. 281;

Laws 1969, c. 153, § 1, p. 719;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 2.